praksid/praks1/naide1.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

+N                ! Nimisõna
+A                ! Omadussõna
+Sg
+Pl
+Nom
+Gen
+All              ! alaeütlev

LEXICON Root

koli+N:koli tüüp_ema ;    ! leksikaalne pool : pindesitus
kena+A:kena tüüp_ema ;
torssis+A:torssis # ;

LEXICON tüüp_ema
    +Sg: ema_sg ;
    +Pl: ema_pl ;
    
LEXICON ema_sg

    +Nom: # ;
    +Gen: # ;
    +All:le # ;
    
LEXICON ema_pl

    +Nom:d # ;
    +Gen:de # ;
    +All:dele # ;
